Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-141, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-141. A. Each school district of this state shall
adopt a minimum salary schedule and shall transmit a copy of it to
the State Board of Education within thirty (30) days after adoption.
A school district shall not calculate salaries of teachers solely as
a proportion of the salaries of the administrators of the district.

Req. No. 16106 Page 1

B. Districts shall be encouraged to provide compensation
schedules to reflect district policies and circumstances, including
differential pay for different subject areas and special incentives
for teachers in districts with specific geographical attributes.
Districts may also adopt a salary schedule that provides additional
compensation for achieving certain ratings under the Oklahoma
Teacher and Leader Effectiveness Evaluation System (TLE) as set
forth in Section 6 6-101.16 of this act title. Any salary schedule
adopted by a district pursuant to this section shall not set
salaries at amounts less than those set pursuant to Section 18-
114.12 18-114.15 of this title.
C. The State Department of Education shall compile a report of
the minimum salary schedules for every school district in the state
and shall submit the report to the Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives, and President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma
State Senate no later than December 15 of each year.
D. 1. Each school district shall file within fifteen (15) days
of signing the contract, the employment contract of the
superintendent of the school district with the State Department of
Education. The Department shall keep all contracts available for
inspection by the public. The school district shall not be
authorized to pay any salary, benefits or other compensation to a
superintendent which are not specified in the contract on file and
shall not pay administrators any amounts for accumulated sick leave
Req. No. 16106 Page 2

that are not calculated on the same formula used for determining
payment for accumulated sick leave benefits for other full-time
employees of that school district and shall not pay administrators
any amounts for accumulated vacation leave benefits that are not
calculated on the same formula used for determining payment for
accumulated vacation leave benefits for other twelve-month full-time
employees of that school district.
2. No employment contracts of district superintendents shall
include a total compensation package that exceeds six (6) times the
salary set by the district for a teacher with a bachelor's degree
and zero (0) years of experience. For purposes of this paragraph,
total compensation includes base salary, supplements, fringe
benefits, bonuses, and all other compensation. The provisions of
this paragraph shall apply to contracts that are entered into or
renewed on or after the effective date of this act.
E. By October 1 of each year, each district board of education
shall prepare a schedule of salaries and fringe benefits paid
administrators employed by the district, including a description of
the fringe benefits. The schedule shall be a public record and
shall be disclosed as required by the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
The board shall file a copy of the schedule with the State
Department of Education within one (1) week of completion.
F. For purposes of this section, the term "administrator" shall
include employees who are employed and certified as superintendents,
Req. No. 16106 Page 3

assi stant superintendents, principals, and assistant principals and
who have responsibilities for supervising classroom teachers.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16106 SW 02/04/26















Req. No. 16106 Page 4